Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 134 Y 245
SFX 134    0       on/705      .
SFX 134    0       agandik      .
SFX 134    0       ari      .
SFX 134    0       egia      .
SFX 134    0       etako/692      .
SFX 134    0       en/710      .
SFX 134    0       txoei      .
SFX 134    0       egik      .
SFX 134    0       txoek      .
SFX 134    0       txoak      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrekin      .
SFX 134    0       txoen      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrean      .
SFX 134    0       txoan      .
SFX 134    0       agan      .
SFX 134    0       aren/703      .
SFX 134    0       egitaraino      .
SFX 134    0       egiz      .
SFX 134    0       txoez      .
SFX 134    0       txoaz      .
SFX 134    0       agootaz      .
SFX 134    0       erainoko      .
SFX 134    0       otatik      .
SFX 134    0       eko/692      .
SFX 134    0       agoei      .
SFX 134    0       egirekin      .
SFX 134    0       agoek      .
SFX 134    0       agoak      .
SFX 134    0       egiei      .
SFX 134    0       agoen      .
SFX 134    0       agoan      .
SFX 134    0       egiek      .
SFX 134    0       egiak      .
SFX 134    0       egien      .
SFX 134    0       egian      .
SFX 134    0       agoez      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrokin      .
SFX 134    0       agoaz      .
SFX 134    0       egiez      .
SFX 134    0       egiaz      .
SFX 134    0       arekin      .
SFX 134    0       arekiko      .
SFX 134    0       ean      .
SFX 134    0       a      .
SFX 134    0       tzarraren      .
SFX 134    0       i      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrerat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrontzat      .
SFX 134    0       egiaren      .
SFX 134    0       agoarekin      .
SFX 134    0       egietarantz      .
SFX 134    0       egiraino      .
SFX 134    0       egiekin      .
SFX 134    0       agana      .
SFX 134    0       tzar      .
SFX 134    0       tzat      .
SFX 134    0       txoegi      .
SFX 134    0       txoendako      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrago      .
SFX 134    0       egiokin      .
SFX 134    0       eraino      .
SFX 134    0       etarantzago      .
SFX 134    0       agogatik      .
SFX 134    0       otako      .
SFX 134    0       txorik      .
SFX 134    0       txoren      .
SFX 134    0       txorat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarretik      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrera      .
SFX 134    0       txora      .
SFX 134    0       otaraino      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrarekin      .
SFX 134    0       txori      .
SFX 134    0       ago      .
SFX 134    0       aganantz      .
SFX 134    0       agora      .
SFX 134    0       etariko      .
SFX 134    0       egiontzat      .
SFX 134    0       tzartzat      .
SFX 134    0       egira      .
SFX 134    0       agori      .
SFX 134    0       egiri      .
SFX 134    0       txotzat      .
SFX 134    0       agoendako      .
SFX 134    0       agorantz      .
SFX 134    0       egitarik      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrotaz      .
SFX 134    0       era      .
SFX 134    0       ei      .
SFX 134    0       ik      .
SFX 134    0       ek      .
SFX 134    0       ak      .
SFX 134    0       egitarat      .
SFX 134    0       txoentzat      .
SFX 134    0       ez      .
SFX 134    0       az      .
SFX 134    0       ekin      .
SFX 134    0       etatiko      .
SFX 134    0       egirik      .
SFX 134    0       txorekin      .
SFX 134    0       egiren      .
SFX 134    0       etarainoko      .
SFX 134    0       egirat      .
SFX 134    0       agorik      .
SFX 134    0       agoren      .
SFX 134    0       agorat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarreraino      .
SFX 134    0       egietan      .
SFX 134    0       etarik      .
SFX 134    0       txotik      .
SFX 134    0       okin      .
SFX 134    0       etarat      .
SFX 134    0       etaranzko      .
SFX 134    0       tzargatik      .
SFX 134    0       erat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrei      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrik      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrek      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrak      .
SFX 134    0       tzarren      .
SFX 134    0       egiarekin      .
SFX 134    0       txoraino      .
SFX 134    0       egitarantz      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrez      .
SFX 134    0       egiotaz      .
SFX 134    0       tzarraz      .
SFX 134    0       egigatik      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrendako      .
SFX 134    0       erantzago      .
SFX 134    0       etaraino      .
SFX 134    0       txorendako      .
SFX 134    0       txoa      .
SFX 134    0       agoentzat      .
SFX 134    0       agatik      .
SFX 134    0       txok      .
SFX 134    0       egitatik      .
SFX 134    0       txoarendako      .
SFX 134    0       txoz      .
SFX 134    0       txoekin      .
SFX 134    0       agoa      .
SFX 134    0       txooi      .
SFX 134    0       tzarregi      .
SFX 134    0       txook      .
SFX 134    0       agok      .
SFX 134    0       txoon      .
SFX 134    0       tzarreko      .
SFX 134    0       txoko      .
SFX 134    0       egitik      .
SFX 134    0       egatik      .
SFX 134    0       egietara      .
SFX 134    0       egitan      .
SFX 134    0       txooz      .
SFX 134    0       agoz      .
SFX 134    0       etarantzegi      .
SFX 134    0       gatiko      .
SFX 134    0       agotik      .
SFX 134    0       egiendako      .
SFX 134    0       agotzat      .
SFX 134    0       etatik      .
SFX 134    0       txookin      .
SFX 134    0       agooi      .
SFX 134    0       agook      .
SFX 134    0       egioi      .
SFX 134    0       agoon      .
SFX 134    0       egiok      .
SFX 134    0       agoko      .
SFX 134    0       egirantz      .
SFX 134    0       txo      .
SFX 134    0       egion      .
SFX 134    0       ekiko      .
SFX 134    0       egiko      .
SFX 134    0       agooz      .
SFX 134    0       txoaren      .
SFX 134    0       ezko      .
SFX 134    0       egioz      .
SFX 134    0       etik      .
SFX 134    0       egiarendako      .
SFX 134    0       egi      .
SFX 134    0       etan      .
SFX 134    0       txoari      .
SFX 134    0       etiko      .
SFX 134    0       egirendako      .
SFX 134    0       gatik      .
SFX 134    0       tzarra      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrentzat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarri      .
SFX 134    0       txorentzat      .
SFX 134    0       erantz      .
SFX 134    0       agoekin      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrarendako      .
SFX 134    0       otan      .
SFX 134    0       etarako      .
SFX 134    0       etarago      .
SFX 134    0       egietarik      .
SFX 134    0       egitara      .
SFX 134    0       agorendako      .
SFX 134    0       txoarentzat      .
SFX 134    0       otaz      .
SFX 134    0       txogatik      .
SFX 134    0       egietarat      .
SFX 134    0       eranzko      .
SFX 134    0       etara      .
SFX 134    0       otarantz      .
SFX 134    0       agoaren      .
SFX 134    0       egiari      .
SFX 134    0       egietaraino      .
SFX 134    0       agoari      .
SFX 134    0       egiarentzat      .
SFX 134    0       okiko      .
SFX 134    0       egirentzat      .
SFX 134    0       agoarendako      .
SFX 134    0       erantzegi      .
SFX 134    0       egietako      .
SFX 134    0       agookin      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrarentzat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrerantz      .
SFX 134    0       egientzat      .
SFX 134    0       txootaz      .
SFX 134    0       agorentzat      .
SFX 134    0       egietatik      .
SFX 134    0       agorekin      .
SFX 134    0       oi      .
SFX 134    0       ok      .
SFX 134    0       txoontzat      .
SFX 134    0       oz      .
SFX 134    0       txoago      .
SFX 134    0       txorantz      .
SFX 134    0       aganaino      .
SFX 134    0       etarantz      .
SFX 134    0       otarik      .
SFX 134    0       otarat      .
SFX 134    0       agoraino      .
SFX 134    0       egitako      .
SFX 134    0       tzarroi      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrok      .
SFX 134    0       tzarrari      .
SFX 134    0       tzarron      .
SFX 134    0       agoarentzat      .
SFX 134    0       tzarroz      .
SFX 134    0       egitzat      .
SFX 134    0       otara      .
SFX 134    0       agoontzat      .
SFX 134    0       txoarekin      .
SFX 134    0       erako      .
SFX 134    0       erago      .
